Maine, session 132, LD1503.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6301, sub-§2, ¶W, as amended by PL 2017, c. 296, §4, is
further amended to read:
W. A commercial green crab only license issued under section 6808 expires on April
30th of each year; and
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6301, sub-§2, ¶X, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 296, §5, is
amended to read:
X. An aquaculture license issued under section 6810‑B expires on April 30th of each
year.; and
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6301, sub-§2, ¶Y is enacted to read:
Y. A green crab only wholesale dealer license issued under section 6866 expires on
March 31st of each year.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §6866 is enacted to read:
§6866. Green crab only wholesale dealer license
1. Definition. For the purposes of this section, unless the context indicates otherwise,
"green crab" means the species Carcinus maenas.
2. License required. A person may not engage in the activities authorized under this
section without a current:
A. Green crab only wholesale dealer license established by this section; or
B. Wholesale seafood license pursuant to section 6851.
3. License activities. The holder of a green crab only wholesale dealer license may,
in wholesale trade, buy, sell, process, ship or transport green crabs purchased directly from
harvesters in this State. A holder of a green crab only wholesale dealer license when buying
directly from a harvester may buy only from a harvester who possesses a license or permit
to harvest green crabs required under this Part. The harvester shall make the applicable
Page 1 - 132LR1091(03)

marine resources license or permit available for inspection upon the green crab only
wholesale dealer license holder's request.
4. License fee. The fee for a green crab only wholesale dealer license is $50. The
license fee must be deposited in the Green Crab Management Fund established in section
6809.
5. License limited. A license under this section authorizes activities at only one
establishment or with only one vehicle.
6. Violation. A person who engages in activities authorized under subsection 3
without a license specified in subsection 2 is subject to a penalty established by the
department. The department may revoke or suspend a green crab only wholesale dealer
license for violation of this section.
7. Sunset. This section is repealed January 1, 2031.
8. Review. Prior to the repeal of this section pursuant to subsection 6, the department
shall conduct a review of the effectiveness of the green crab only wholesale dealer license
and submit a report to the 134th Legislature in 2030. The report must include the
department's recommendations concerning possible continuation or modification of the
green crab only wholesale dealer license.
Page 2 - 132LR1091(03)